Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-608
County court procedure; petition; guardian ad litem; hearing.

If a dispute arises as to whether the individual is incapable, a petition may be filed with the county court in the county in which the individual resides or is located requesting the court's determination as to whether the individual is incapable of making health care decisions. If such a petition is filed, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the individual. The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition within seven days after the court's receipt of the petition. Within seven days after the hearing, the court shall issue its determination. If the court determines that the individual is incapable, the authority, rights, and responsibilities of the individual's surrogate shall become effective. If the court determines that the individual is capable, the authority, rights, and responsibilities of the surrogate shall not become effective.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 8.